Nevada, session 83, SB471.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 387.12455 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
387.12455 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection [5,]
2 or 6, for the purpose of establishing budgetary estimates for
-
*SB471*

– 3 –
expenditures and revenues for the State Education Fund as
prescribed by the State Budget Act, the Governor shall, to the extent
practicable, ensure that [an amount of money in the State General
Fund is reserved in] the proposed executive budget [for transfer to]
includes an amount of money in the State Education Fund ,
excluding the Education Stabilization Account, which is sufficient
to [fully] fund [:
(a) If the Economic Forum projects that the revenue collected by
the State for general, unrestricted uses will increase by a rate that is
greater than the combined rate of inflation and the growth of
enrollment in the public schools in this State in the immediately
preceding biennium,] an amount of money in the [State General
Fund for transfer to the] State Education Fund for the subsequent
biennium which is not less than the amount of money [transferred
to] in the State Education Fund [from the State General Fund for] ,
excluding the Education Stabilization Account, for the
immediately preceding biennium increased by [an amount not less
than] the lower of:
(a) The rate of increase for the revenue collected by the State
for general, unrestricted uses as projected by the Economic Forum
[.] ; or
(b) [If the Economic Forum projects that the revenue collected
by the State for general, unrestricted uses will increase by a rate that
is not greater than the] The combined rate of inflation and the
growth of enrollment in the public schools in this State in the
immediately preceding biennium . [, an amount of money in the
State General Fund for transfer to the State Education Fund for the
subsequent biennium which is not less than the amount of money
transferred to the State Education Fund from the State General Fund
for the immediately preceding biennium increased by an amount not
less than the combined rate of inflation and the growth of enrollment
in the public schools in this State.
(c) If the Economic Forum projects that the revenue collected by
the State for general, unrestricted uses will decrease, an amount of
money in the State General Fund for transfer to the State Education
Fund for the subsequent biennium which is not less than the amount
of money transferred to the State Education Fund from the State
General Fund for the immediately preceding biennium decreased by
an amount not greater than the rate of decrease for the revenue
collected by the State as projected by the Economic Forum.]
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection [5, as] 6, the
Governor shall ensure that the amount of money included in the
proposed executive budget for transfer from the State General
Fund to the State Education Fund is not less than the amount of
money appropriated from the State General Fund to the State
-
*SB471*

– 4 –
Education Fund for the immediately preceding biennium unless
the Economic Forum projects that the revenue collected by the
State for general, unrestricted use will decrease. If the Economic
Forum projects that the revenue collected by the State for general,
unrestricted use will decrease:
(a) The amount of any decrease in the amount of money
transferred in the proposed executive budget from the State
General Fund to the State Education Fund must not exceed the
rate of decrease for the revenue collected by the State for general,
unrestricted use as projected by the Economic Forum; and
(b) The Governor is not required to ensure that the proposed
executive budget includes an amount of money in the State
Education Fund that complies with the provisions of subsection 1.
3. As part of the proposed executive budget, the Governor shall
[, to the extent practicable,] include recommendations for [:
(a) The] the statewide base per pupil funding amount [, which
must be equal to the statewide base per pupil funding amount for the
immediately preceding biennium increased by an amount not less
than the combined rate of inflation and the growth of enrollment in
the public schools in this State unless the amount of money
contained in the State Education Fund, excluding the Education
Stabilization Account, decreases from the immediately preceding
biennium, in which event the Governor must recommend a
proportional reduction to both the statewide base per pupil funding
amount and the multiplier for each category of pupils pursuant to
paragraph (b);] and
[(b) The] the multiplier for weighted funding for each category
of pupils . [, which must not be less than the multiplier for the
immediately preceding biennium unless:
(1) The amount of money contained in the State Education
Fund, excluding the Education Stabilization Account, decreases
from the immediately preceding biennium, in which event the
Governor must recommend a proportional reduction to both the
statewide base per pupil funding amount pursuant to paragraph (a)
and the multiplier for each category of pupils; or
(2) The amount of money contained in the State Education
Fund, excluding the Education Stabilization Account, increases
from the preceding fiscal year but in an amount which, after
recommending the statewide base per pupil funding amount
pursuant to paragraph (a), is insufficient to fund the multiplier for
each category of pupils, in which event the Governor must
recommend the remaining money in the State Education Fund,
excluding the Education Stabilization Account, be used to provide a
multiplier for each category of pupils which is as close as
practicable to the multiplier for the preceding fiscal year.
-
*SB471*

– 5 –
3.] 4. When determining the amount of money to [reserve for
transfer from the State General Fund to] include in the State
Education Fund in the proposed executive budget pursuant to
subsection 1, the Governor shall consider the recommendations of
the Commission, as revised by the Joint Interim Standing
Committee on Education, if applicable, for an optimal level of
funding for education and may [reserve] include an additional
amount of money [for transfer] to the State Education Fund that the
Governor determines to be sufficient to fund any recommendation
or any portion of a recommendation that the Governor includes in
the proposed executive budget.
[4.] 5. As part of the proposed executive budget, the Governor
may recommend to the Legislature a revision to any appropriation
made by law pursuant to NRS 387.1214, including, without
limitation, the statewide base per pupil funding amount, the adjusted
base per pupil funding for any school district, the multiplier for
weighted funding for any category of pupils or the creation or
elimination of a category of pupils to receive additional weighted
funding. The Governor may recommend additional funding for any
recommendation made pursuant to this subsection.
[5.] 6. If the Governor determines that it would be
impracticable to prepare the proposed executive budget as described
in subsection 1 or 2, the Governor may instead include in the
proposed executive budget a recommendation for such funding for
the public schools in this State as he or she determines to be
appropriate. [If the Governor includes in the proposed executive
budget recommendations pursuant to this subsection, the
recommendations must be accompanied by such recommendations
for legislation as the Governor determines to be appropriate to
improve the method by which funding for the public schools in this
State is determined.
6.] 7. As used in this section, “rate of inflation” means the
average percentage of increase or decrease in the Consumer Price
Index for All Urban Consumers, West Region (All Items), as
published by the United States Department of Labor for the
immediately preceding 3 calendar years or, if that index ceases to be
published by the United States Department of Labor, the published
index that most closely resembles that index, as determined by the
Governor.
Sec. 2. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
H
-
*SB471*